Utah statutes.
10-3-928.   Attorney duties -- Deputy public prosecutor.

In cities with a city attorney, the city attorney:

(1)  may prosecute violations of city ordinances;

(2)  may prosecute, under state law, infractions and misdemeanors occurring within the boundaries of the municipality;

(3)  has the same powers in respect to violations as are exercised by a county attorney or district attorney, except that a city attorney's authority to grant immunity shall be limited to:

(a)  granting transactional immunity for violations of city ordinances; and

(b)  granting transactional immunity under state law for infractions and misdemeanors occurring within the boundaries of the municipality;

(4)  shall represent the interests of the state or the municipality in the appeal of any matter prosecuted in any trial court by the city attorney;

(5)  may cooperate with the Office of the Attorney General during investigations, including those described in Subsection 67-5-18(3)(f); and

(6)  may designate a city attorney from another municipality or a public prosecutor to prosecute a matter, in the court having jurisdiction over the matter, if the city attorney has a conflict of interest regarding the matter being prosecuted.



Amended by Chapter 75, 2011 General Session

